Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.015

Accounts in general fund designated as accounts in state treasury—Credit of earnings to general fund.

On and after July 1, 1985, all accounts heretofore or hereafter created in the state general fund shall be designated and treated as accounts in the state treasury. Unless otherwise designated by statute, all earnings on balances of such accounts shall be credited to the general fund.

[ 1985 c 57 s 89.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.